Illinois, session 104th, HB2379.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 15-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/15-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 15-101)7    Sec. 15-101. Creation of system. A retirement system is 8created to provide retirement annuities and and other benefits 9for employees, as defined in this Article, and their 10dependents.11    The system shall be known and may be cited as State 12Universities Retirement System. All the business of the system 13shall be transacted in that name.14(Source: P.A. 83-1440.)